Colorado statutes. TITLE 41 Aeronautics: Aircraft and Airports
ARTICLE 5
AIRPORT REVENUE BONDS - COUNTY

Cross references:

(1) For definitions applicable to this article, see § 30-26-301 (2)(d).

(2) For the constitutional provision that establishes limitations on the incurring of debt, see § 20 of article X, Colorado Constitution; for authority of local governments to contract debts, see § 6 of article XI, Colorado Constitution; for creation of a debt by a county for acquiring or building airports and landing strips, see § 30-26-301.

Section

41-5-101. Powers.

In addition to the powers which it may now have, any county without any election of the taxpaying or qualified electors thereof has the power under this article:

To acquire by gift, purchase, lease, or exercise of the right of eminent domain, to construct, to reconstruct, to improve, to better, and to extend airport facilities, including any of them within the boundaries of any said county, and to acquire by gift, purchase, or the exercise of the right of eminent domain lands, easements, and rights in land in connection therewith;

To accept loans or grants or both from the United States under any federal law in force to aid in financing the cost of engineering, architectural, or economic investigations or studies, surveys, designs, plans, working drawings, specifications, procedures, or other action preliminary to the construction of an airport;

To accept loans or grants or both from the United States under any federal law in force for the construction or improvement of such airport or airport facilities or both;

To prescribe, revise, and collect in advance or otherwise from any user of such facility or occupant of any real property connected therewith rentals, rates, fees, tolls, and charges, or any combination thereof, for the use of such airport facilities, including, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, landing fees, office rentals, franchise fees, and land and airport rentals; and, in anticipation of the collection of the revenues of such airport facilities, to issue revenue bonds to finance in whole or in part the cost of acquisition, construction, reconstruction, improvement, betterment, or extension of an airport;

To pledge to the punctual payment of said bonds and interest thereon all or any part of the gross revenues arising from such airport facilities;

To enter into and perform contracts or agreements concerning the planning, construction, lease, or other acquisition and the financing of airport facilities, and the maintenance and operation thereof;

To make all contracts, execute all instruments, and do all things necessary or convenient in the exercise of the powers granted in this section or in the performance of its duties or in order to secure the payment of its bonds; but no encumbrance, mortgage, or other pledge of property, excluding any pledged revenues, of the county is created thereby no property, other than money, of the county is liable to be forfeited or taken in payment of said bonds, and no debt on the credit of the county is thereby incurred in any manner for any purpose.

Source:

L. 65:

p. 466, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-21-1.

41-5-102. Authorization - airport facilities and bonds.

The acquisition, construction, reconstruction, lease, improvement, or betterment of any airport or airport facilities, or both, and the issuance of bonds in anticipation of the collection of revenues of such facility to provide funds to pay the cost thereof may be authorized by a vote of a majority of the members of the board of county commissioners at a regular or special meeting thereof. The board shall establish a maximum net effective interest rate for the issue of bonds.

The board of county commissioners, in determining such cost, may include all costs and estimated costs of the issuance of said bonds, all engineering, inspection, fiscal, and legal expenses, all preliminary planning expenses and interest which it is estimated will accrue during the construction or other acquisition period or a period not exceeding two years thereafter on money borrowed or which it is estimated will be borrowed pursuant to this article; any discount on the sale of the bonds; costs of financial, professional, and other estimates and advice; contingencies; any administrative, operating, and other expenses of the county prior to and during such acquisition period and for a period not exceeding two years thereafter, as may be determined by the board of county commissioners; and all such other expenses as may be necessary or incident to the financing, acquisition, improvement, and completion of any airport facility, and the placing of the same in operation, and also such provision or reserves for working capital, operation, or maintenance, or for payment or security of principal of or interest on any bonds during or after such an acquisition or improvement as the board of county commissioners may determine, and also reimbursements to the federal government, or any agency, instrumentality, or corporation thereof, of any moneys theretofore expended for or in connection with any such airport facilities.

All revenue bonds issued under the provisions of this article shall bear interest at a rate such that the net effective interest rate for the issue of bonds does not exceed the maximum net effective interest rate authorized, and shall be executed in such a manner and be payable serially in annual installments beginning not later than two years and extending not more than forty years from the date thereof, and may be made payable at such place as the board of county commissioners determines. Said bonds may be made callable for redemption prior to maturity in such manner, at such time, and in such amounts, upon payment of a premium not exceeding three percent of the principal, as may be determined by the board of county commissioners.

Said bonds may be sold at, above, or below their par values, but they may not be sold at a price such that the net effective interest rate of the issue of bonds exceeds the maximum net effective interest rate authorized.

Said bonds may be sold at private sale to the United States or any agency, instrumentality, or corporation thereof or to the state of Colorado or any agency or instrumentality thereof. Unless sold to the United States or any agency, instrumentality, or corporation thereof or to the state of Colorado or any agency or instrumentality thereof, said bonds shall be sold at public sale after notice of such sale published once at least five days prior to such sale in a newspaper of general circulation in said county or in a financial newspaper.

The revenue bonds issued under this article shall be serially numbered and shall be paid off and retired in the order in which they were issued, but such order of payment shall not apply to warrants or bonds made callable for redemption prior to maturity in the inverse order of their numbers.

Subject to the payment provisions in this article specifically provided, said bonds and any interest coupons thereto attached shall be fully negotiable within the meaning of and for all purposes of article 8 of title 4, C.R.S., pertaining to investment securities, except as the governing body may otherwise provide; and each holder of each such security, by accepting such security, shall be conclusively deemed to have agreed that such security, except as otherwise provided, is fully negotiable within the meaning and for all purposes of article 8 of title 4, C.R.S., pertaining to investment securities.

If lost or completely destroyed, any security authorized by this article may be reissued in the form and tenor of the lost or destroyed security upon the owner's furnishing, to the satisfaction of the governing body, the following: Proof of ownership; proof of loss or destruction; a surety bond in twice the face amount of the security, including any unmatured coupons appertaining thereto; and payment of the cost of preparing and issuing the new security.

The resolution authorizing any bonds or other instrument appertaining thereto may contain any agreement or provision customarily contained in instruments securing revenue bonds.

Source:

L. 65:

p. 467, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-21-2.

L. 70:

p. 139, § 7.

L. 75:

(7) amended, p. 227, § 92, effective July 16.

Cross references:

For the definition of "net effective interest rate", as used in subsections (1), (3), and (4) of this section, see § 30-26-301 (2)(d)(I).

41-5-103. Sinking fund - indebtedness.

The board of county commissioners of any county is authorized to set aside a special sinking fund in the office of the county treasurer for the payment of revenue bonds authorized by and issued under the provisions of this article and for the payment of interest due on such bonds, but the general income of the county shall not be pledged for the payment of the principal of the bonds and interest thereon. The county treasurer shall deposit in said sinking fund all rents, royalties, fees, rates, and charges derived from or rendered by the airport or airport facilities, and the board of county commissioners of any county may pledge any or all moneys in said sinking fund to the payment of bonds authorized under this article and the interest thereon.

Revenue bonds issued under this article shall not constitute an indebtedness of the county within the meaning of any constitutional or statutory limitations. Each bond issued under this article shall recite in substance that said bond, including interest thereon, is payable solely from the revenues pledged to the payment thereof and that said bond does not constitute a debt of the county within the meaning of any constitutional or statutory limitations.

Source:

L. 65:

p. 469, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-21-3.

41-5-104. Signatures of county commissioners.

The bonds and any coupons bearing the signatures of county commissioners in office on the date of the signing thereof shall be valid and binding obligations of the county, notwithstanding that, before the delivery thereof and payment thereof, any of the persons whose signatures appear thereon have ceased to be county commissioners of the county issuing the same.

Source:

L. 65:

p. 470, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-21-4.

41-5-105. Bonds - exempt from taxation.

The bonds and the income therefrom shall be exempt from taxation, except inheritance, estate, and transfer taxes.

Source:

L. 65:

p. 470, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-21-5.

Cross references:

For the taxation of bonds issued pursuant to the "Public Airport Authority Act", see § 41-3-107.

41-5-106. Rights of holders.

Any holder of any issue of bonds or any holder of bonds, subject to any contractual limitations therein, and for the equal benefit and protection of all holders of bonds similarly situated, has the following rights and powers:

By mandamus or other suit, action, or proceeding at law or in equity, to enforce his and other such holders' rights against the county and its governing body to require and compel such county or governing body to perform and carry out its duties and obligations under this article and its covenants and agreements with the bondholders; and

By action or suit in equity, to require the county and the governing body thereof to account as if they were the trustee of an express trust.

No right or remedy conferred by this article upon any holder of bonds is intended to be exclusive of any other right or remedy, but each such right or remedy is cumulative and in addition to every other right or remedy and may be exercised without exhausting and without regard to any other remedy conferred by this article or by any other law.

Source:

L. 65:

p. 470, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-21-6.

41-5-107. Powers supplemental.

The powers conferred by this article shall be in addition and supplemental to, and not in substitution for, any other law, and the limitations imposed by this article shall not affect any powers conferred by any other such law. Bonds may be issued under this article without regard to the provisions of any other law. The airport facilities may be acquired, purchased, constructed, reconstructed, improved, bettered, and extended, and bonds may be issued under this article for said purposes, notwithstanding that any law may provide for the acquisition, purchase, construction, reconstruction, improvement, betterment, and extension of an airport, and without regard to the requirements, restrictions, debt, or other limitations or other provisions contained in any other law, including, but not limited to, any requirement for any restriction or limitation on the incurring of indebtedness or the issuance of bonds. Insofar as the provisions of this article are inconsistent with the provisions of any other law, the provisions of this article shall be controlling.

Source:

L. 65:

p. 470, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-21-7.

41-5-108. Refunding.

Revenue bonds issued pursuant to the provisions of this article may be refunded in the manner provided by the "Refunding Revenue Securities Law", as set forth in article 54 of title 11, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 65:

p. 471, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-21-8.

41-5-109. Citation to this article - incontestability of bonds.

Any resolution authorizing any bonds under this article may provide that each bond therein authorized shall recite that it is issued under authority of this article. Such recital shall conclusively impart full compliance with all of the provisions of this article, and all bonds issued containing such recital shall be incontestable for any cause whatsoever after their delivery for value.

Source:

L. 65:

p. 471, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-21-9.